Utah statutes.
20A-1-507.   Midterm vacancies in the State Board of Education.

(1)  If a vacancy occurs on the State Board of Education for any reason other than the expiration of a member's term, the governor, with the consent of the Senate, shall fill the vacancy by appointment of a qualified member to serve out the unexpired term.

(2)  The lieutenant governor shall issue a certificate of appointment to the appointed member and certify the appointment to the board.



Enacted by Chapter 1, 1993 General Session

